Washington statutes.
RCW 11.80.070

Period of trusteeship.

Such trusteeship shall continue until such time as the owner of such property shall return or shall appoint a duly authorized agent or attorney-in-fact to care for such property, or until such time as the property shall be provisionally distributed to the presumptive heirs, or to the devisees and legatees of the absentee as hereinafter provided, or until such time as the property shall escheat to the state as hereinafter provided.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.80.070. Prior: 1915 c 39 s 6; RRS s 1715-6.]